Nevada, session 83, AB237.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 244.164 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.164 1. [In each county having a population of 100,000 or
more, the] The board of county commissioners of each county may
create the office of registrar of voters, prescribe the qualifications,
duties and compensation of that office and make appointments to
that office.
2. The registrar of voters, upon appointment as provided in
subsection 1, shall assume all of the powers and duties vested in and
imposed upon the county clerk of the county with respect to
elections, except the duties imposed by virtue of NRS 293.393 to
make out and deliver certificates of election.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)